Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-904
Employees' right of self-organization.

Employees shall have the right of self-organization and the right to form, join or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in lawful, concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection; and such employees shall also have the right to refrain from any or all of such activities.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 4, p. 809.